Hawaii statutes.
[§16-3] Election services,
provisions, and charges. The chief election officer may make voting
systems and election services available to state agencies and private entities
pursuant to rules adopted in accordance with chapter 91. Reasonable fees may be
charged for the provision of such systems or services. [L 1993, c 304, §3]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next